Tennessee, session 114, SB1604.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-6-1028(b)(2)(A), is amended by
deleting the first sentence of the subdivision and substituting:
Each LEA and public charter school shall instruct students about the formation of the
governments of the United States and Tennessee using federal and state foundational
documents at the appropriate grade level and consistent with social studies standards
adopted by the state board.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1604
010732
- 1 -